California, session 20252026, AB1045.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66015.9 is added to the Education Code, to read:66015.9. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Financial incentives” includes stipends to supervise students during their service learning placement.(2) “Nonprofit organization” means a tax-exempt organization as defined under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that partners with a participating institution to implement this section.(3) “Participating institution” means a California State University or University of California campus that chooses to implement this section.(4) “Service learning” means an educational approach that intentionally combines meaningful community service activities with instruction and reflection to support student progress toward academic and civic engagement learning objectives while meeting societal needs.(5) “Student” means an undergraduate student enrolled at a participating institution.(b) A participating institution shall may allocate funds to provide financial incentives to nonprofit organizations for purposes of facilitating service learning programs and opportunities for students.(c) A participating institution shall may use existing resources or secure additional funding, such as private donations or grants, to implement this section.